North Carolina, session 2025, HB1205.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 2 of Chapter 90 is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-29.6. Certain orthodontic device and treatment requirements.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Licensed dentist. – As defined in G.S. 90-30.2(a).
(2) Orthodontic device. – Any Class II or Class III medical device, as defined by
21 U.S.C. § 360c and 21 CFR § 860.3 that meets all of the following:
a. Used in orthodontic treatment to (i) move a patient's teeth or jaw or
(ii) correct a misalignment or malposition.
b. Manufactured to address the specific orthodontic needs of an
individual patient.
(b) Limitation. – A person shall not sell an orthodontic device or provide a service related
to the design or manufacture of an orthodontic device to a patient, unless the person is a licensed
dentist who is in compliance with subsection (c) of this section, or receives written or electronic
confirmation from a licensed dentist who has provided the services prescribed in subsection (c)
of this section.
(c) Criteria. – A person shall not sell an orthodontic device or provide a service related
to the design or manufacture of an orthodontic device to a patient in this State who has not
received all of the following:
(1) An in-person intraoral dental examination and an examination of the patient's
head and neck.
(2) A review of recently performed x-rays, panoramic x-rays, computed
tomography, bone imaging scans, or other appropriate diagnostic imaging
sufficient to allow the licensed dentist to detect the patient conditions that
preclude or contraindicate the provision of safe orthodontic treatment,
including the following:
a. Untreated caries.
b. Gingivitis and periodontal disease.
c. Issues with the roots of teeth in the periodontium, including short
roots.
d. The presence of an osseointegrated dental implant or other fixed dental
appliance.
*H1205-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e. Fractured, cracked, or split teeth or roots.
f. Any other oral pathology or condition that precludes orthodontic
treatment.
(3) A prescription for an orthodontic device issued by either of the following:
a. The licensed dentist who (i) provided the examination under
subdivision (1) of this subsection and (ii) reviewed the appropriate
diagnostic imaging under subdivision (2) of this subsection.
b. The licensed dentist who (i) will conduct and monitor the patient's
orthodontic treatment and (ii) has received or requested either of the
following:
1. A referral from the patient's licensed dentist under subdivision
(1) of this subsection.
2. Clearance for orthodontic treatment from the patient's licensed
dentist.
(4) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, advice and counsel by a licensed
dentist under subdivision (3) of this subsection regarding available
orthodontic treatment options and the risks associated with those treatments.
(5) A review of the patient's medical and dental health histories.
(d) Consent. – The required advice and counsel under subdivision (c)(4) of this section
must be signed by the patient acknowledging and verifying that the patient received the advice
and counsel from the licensed dentist. The licensed dentist that provides the advice and counsel
shall attach and maintain the patient's written acknowledgement and verification in the patient's
file.
(e) Records. – A licensed dentist shall maintain all records and documents regarding a
sale of an orthodontic device to a patient or provision of services related to the design or
manufacture of that device for no less than seven years after the date of sale or provision of those
services.
(f) Condition. – A licensed dentist shall not require a patient to agree to use a particular
type of orthodontic device as a condition of performing the examination or review described in
this section.
(g) Disclosure of Records. – Upon request of another licensed dentist, the dentist
providing an orthodontic device or related services to a patient must disclose and provide any
patient records collected under this section in the course of treatment."
SECTION 2. The North Carolina State Board of Dental Examiners may adopt rules
to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to educate the public of the provisions of this act. The Department shall consult with the
North Carolina State Board of Dental Examiners in educating the public.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. Section 1 of this
act becomes effective October 1, 2026. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 1205-First Edition